District of Columbia statutes.
22-3006

Misdemeanor sexual abuse.

Whoever engages in a sexual act or sexual contact with another person and who should have knowledge or reason to know that the act was committed without that other person’s permission, shall be imprisoned for not more than 180 days and, in addition, may be fined in an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 205, 42 DCR 53
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 232(e), 60 DCR 2064
Consent defense to sexual abuse, see § 22-3007.
This section is referenced in § 16-801, § 22-4151, and § 23-581.
1981 Ed., § 22-4106.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “in an amount not to exceed $1,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 232(e) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.